Utah statutes.
57-1-23.5.   Civil liability for unauthorized person who exercises power of sale.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Unauthorized person" means a person who does not qualify as a trustee under Subsection 57-1-21(1)(a)(i) or (iv).

(b)  "Unauthorized sale" means the exercise of a power of sale by an unauthorized person.

(2) (a)  An unauthorized person who conducts an unauthorized sale is liable to the trustor for the actual damages suffered by the trustor as a result of the unauthorized sale or $2,000, whichever is greater.

(b)  In an action under Subsection (2)(a), the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff the plaintiff's costs and attorney fees.

